Washington statutes.
RCW 36.120.090

Governing board—Composition.

(1) The governing board of a district consists of the members of the legislative authority of each member county, acting ex officio and independently. The secretary of transportation or the appropriate regional administrator of the department, as named by the secretary, shall also serve as a nonvoting member of the board. The governing board may elect an executive board of seven members to discharge the duties of the governing board subject to the approval of the full governing board.

(2) A sixty-percent majority of the weighted votes of the total board membership is required to submit to the counties a modified plan under RCW 36.120.140 or any other proposal to be submitted to the voters. The counties may, with majority vote of each county legislative authority, submit a modified plan or proposal to the voters.

[ 2002 c 56 s 109.]